Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204B.36, subdivision 5, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-01194 204B.36 BALLOTS; FORM. Subd. 5. Designation of incumbent; judicial offices. If a chief justice, associate justice, or judge is a candidate to succeed again, the word "incumbent" shall be printed after that judge's name as a candidate.